Utah statutes.
7-1-309.   Hearings by commissioner -- Discretion of commissioner --
Procedure -- Judicial review.
The commissioner may conduct or cause to be conducted hearings relating to
matters within his supervisory jurisdiction and shall establish rules for
discovery and other procedures applicable to the hearings consistent with the
provisions of the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure. The decision whether or not
to hold a formal hearing on any matter coming before the commissioner under
this title shall be solely within the discretion of the commissioner.  His
failure or refusal to hold a formal hearing is not a ground for reversal of
any decision or order of the commissioner unless the reviewing court finds
that such failure or refusal has deprived an interested party of due process
of law, or that a formal hearing is required by the provisions of this title.
